Hawaii statutes.
[§305J-1] Post-secondary education
authorization program; establishment. There is established a
post-secondary education authorization program within the department of
commerce and consumer affairs, to be administered by the director of commerce
and consumer affairs. [L 2013, c 180, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next